Illinois, session 104th, HB3354.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Illinois Pension Code is amended by 5changing Section 5-228 as follows: 6    (40 ILCS 5/5-228)  (from Ch. 108 1/2, par. 5-228)7    Sec. 5-228. Administrative review. 8    (a) The provisions of the Administrative Review Law, and 9all amendments and modifications thereof and the rules adopted 10pursuant thereto, shall apply to and govern all proceedings 11for the judicial review of final administrative decisions of 12the retirement board provided for under this Article. The term 13"administrative decision" is as defined in Section 3-101 of 14the Code of Civil Procedure.15    (b) If any policeman whose application for either a duty 16disability benefit under Section 5-154, or for an occupational 17disease disability benefit under Section 5-154.1, or for an 18ordinary disability benefit under Section 5-155 has been 19denied by a majority vote the Retirement Board brings an 20action for administrative review challenging the denial of 21disability benefits and the policeman prevails in the action 22in administrative review, then the prevailing policeman shall 23be entitled to recover from the Fund court costs and   HB3354- 2 -LRB104 11812 RPS 21901 b1litigation expenses, including reasonable attorney's fees, as 2part of the costs of the action. 3    (c) If a policeman whose duty disability benefits, 4ordinary disability benefits, or occupational disability 5benefits are terminated by a majority vote of the Retirement 6Board brings an action for administrative review challenging 7the termination of those disability benefits and prevails in 8the action in administrative review, then the prevailing 9policeman shall be entitled to recover from the Fund court 10costs and litigation expenses, including reasonable attorney's 11fees, as part of the costs of the action. 12(Source: P.A. 101-387, eff. 8-16-19.) 13    Section 90. The State Mandates Act is amended by adding 14Section 8.49 as follows: 15    (30 ILCS 805/8.49 new)16    Sec. 8.49. Exempt mandate. Notwithstanding Sections 6 and 178 of this Act, no reimbursement by the State is required for 18the implementation of any mandate created by this amendatory 19Act of the 104th General Assembly. 20    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 21becoming law.